Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB858.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 455 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In any criminal matter pending in a Circuit Court or a District Court of this
Commonwealth, the parties may request that the matter be referred for mediation.
(2) Upon agreement of all parties, including the victim, the court may refer the
matter to a mediator who:
(a) Meets at least two (2) of the following qualifications:
1. A formerly elected county attorney or Commonwealth's attorney,
having served at least one (1) term in office, who has been a licensed
attorney for no less than fifteen (15) years;
2. A former attorney with the Department of Public Advocacy who has
been a licensed attorney for no less than fifteen (15) years;
3. A former District Judge or Circuit Judge who has been a licensed
attorney for no less than fifteen (15) years;
4. A licensed attorney for no less than twenty-five (25) years who has
extensive experience in criminal law; or
5. A licensed attorney with a minimum of two (2) years of service as:
i. An administrative law judge with the Department of Workers'
Claims under KRS Chapter 342;
ii. A domestic relations commissioner; or
iii. A hearing officer qualified under KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) Has experience in:
1. The same circuit or district where the case is pending;
2. A circuit or district that is contiguous to the circuit or district where
the case is pending; or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 1:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2259
3. A circuit or district within a radius of seventy-five (75) miles of the
circuit or district where the case is pending; and
(c) Has completed a minimum of forty (40) hours of mediation training.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the mediator shall be compensated as
authorized by the policies of the Court of Justice.
(4) (a) The mediation authorized under this section shall be in addition to any
felony mediation program authorized by the Court of Justice.
(b) To promote uniformity, the rules adopted by the Court of Justice related to
confidentiality and reporting to the court shall apply to any mediation under
this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 1:28 PM Jacketed